Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-729
Terms, defined.

Where appearing in sections 29-729 to 29-758, the term Governor includes any person performing the functions of Governor by authority of the law of this state. The term Executive Authority includes the Governor, and any person performing the functions of Governor in a state other than this state, and the term State, referring to a state other than this state, includes any other state or territory, organized or unorganized, of the United States of America.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 1, p. 558.

Alleged violations of Uniform Criminal Extradition Act did not exempt offender from trial and punishment by state. State v. Costello, 199 Neb. 43, 256 N.W.2d 97 (1977).